Utah statutes.
31A-22-421.   Facility of payment under certain life insurance policies.
A life insurance policy with a face value of $5,000 or less may provide that
if the beneficiary designated in the policy does not make a claim under the
policy or does not surrender the policy with due proof of death within a
period stated in the policy, which may not be less than 30 days after the
death of the insured, or if the beneficiary is the estate of the insured, or
is a minor, or dies before the insured, or is not legally competent to give a
valid release, then the insurer may make any payment under the policy to the
executor or administrator of the insured, or to any relative of the insured by
blood or legal adoption or connection by marriage, or to any person appearing
to the insurer to be equitably entitled to the payment by reason of having
incurred expense for the maintenance, medical attention, or burial of the
insured, or for other reasons.  The policy may also include a similar
provision applicable to any other payment due under the policy.
